Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.61, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Testing required. (a) Cannabis businesses and hemp businesses shall not sell or offer for sale cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products to another cannabis business or hemp business, or to a customer or patient, or otherwise transfer cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products to another cannabis business or hemp business, unless: (1) a representative sample of the batch of cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products has been tested according to this section and rules adopted under this chapter; (2) the testing was completed by a cannabis testing facility licensed under this chapter or meeting the requirements of paragraph (b); and (3) the tested sample of cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products was found to meet testing standards established by the office. (b) Testing of lower-potency hemp edibles and hemp-derived consumer products that do not contain intoxicating cannabinoids may be performed by any laboratory that has been accredited pursuant to standard ISO/IEC 17025 of the International Organization for Standardization with specific accreditation for cannabis testing until deleted text begin January 1, 2026deleted text end new text begin May 31, 2027new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end